Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 67 O.S. 2021, Section 305, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 189, O.S.L. 2022 (67 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 305), is amended to read as follows:
Section 305. There is hereby re-created until July 1, 2025
2028, in accordance with the Oklahoma Sunset Law, the Archives and
Records Commission, hereinafter referred to as the Commission, to be
composed of one member to be appointed by the Governor who shall
serve as Chairman, the State Librarian as Vice Chairman and
Secretary, the Lieutenant Governor, the State Auditor and Inspector
and the State Treasurer as members. Any member may appoint and
designate a subofficer or employee as his or her proxy for purposes
of carrying on the duties of the Commission. The Commission shall
have sole, entire and exclusive authority of the disposition for all
public records and archives of state officers, departments, boards,
commissions, agencies and institutions of this state. The authority
herein granted shall not apply to records and archives of political
subdivisions of the state; provided, however, Section 305 et seq. of
this title shall not apply to the confidential records and files of
the Oklahoma Tax Commission which are exempt from all provisions of
this act.

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of February,
2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1034 Page 2